Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201581-1601
State Energy Office; created; director; compensation; personnel.

(1) There is hereby created an agency of state government to be known as the State Energy Office. The office may be a separate division within an existing executive department.

(2) The chief executive officer shall be known as the Director of the State Energy Office and shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Legislature. The director shall administer the affairs of the office and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The director may employ such assistants, professional staff, and other employees as may be deemed necessary to effectively carry out the provisions of sections 81-1601 to 81-1605 within such appropriations as the Legislature may provide. The salary of the director shall be fixed by the Governor unless otherwise expressly provided for by law.

Laws 1977, LB 232, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB469, § 8.
August 30, 2015